West Virginia, session 2025, SB72.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 5. COUNTY BOARD OF EDUCATION. §18-5-22f. Contraceptives; parental notice; definition. (a) A public school located within this state shall provide parental notification when it dispenses a contraceptive to a minor.(b) For the purposes of this section "contraceptive" means a drug or device approved by the Food and Drug Administration to prevent pregnancy.